Louisiana, session 2026, HB48.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2174(B)(1)(b)(introductory paragraph) and (3)(a) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 11:2173.1, 2174(B)(6), and 2178(O) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§2173.1. Employers' responsibilities
Each agency that employs a person who is required to be a member of this
fund under the provisions of R.S. 11:2174 or who is a member of this fund pursuant
to any other provision of law shall be subject to the laws, requirements, terms, and
conditions that apply to any sheriff in the sheriff's capacity as an employer
participating in the fund, including the provisions mandating the employer to remit
to the fund the amounts required to be deducted from the salaries of the members and
the percentage of the total of the participating members' salaries set as an employer
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 48 ENROLLED
contribution rate by the board in accordance with R.S. 11:103 and 2175.1 and the
provisions providing penalties for delinquent contributions contained in R.S.
11:2181.
§2174. Remittance of percentage of taxes collected to fund; membership; salary
deductions; deficiency in fund; credit
* * *
B. Membership. (1)
* * *
(b) Each deputy, including the criminal and civil deputies of the parish of
Orleans, and the criers of the several divisions of the Civil District Court for the
parish of Orleans and the Louisiana Supreme Court who, on the date of the filing of
the application to become a member, is age eighteen or over shall become a member
of this fund, provided that his monthly salary including state supplemental pay is not
less than the following:
* * *
(3)(a) The percentage specified in R.S. 11:62(9) of the salaries of all
members of the Sheriffs' Pension and Relief Fund shall be deducted and a remittance
covering such deductions, together with the percentage determined in accordance
with R.S. 11:103 of the total of the participating members' salaries, including for
sheriffs the expense allowance provided by law in addition to regular salary, to be
paid from the sheriff's general fund or from the appropriate funding source of the
employer of the member, shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the board. In the
event of the failure of any sheriff or other employer of any member to make such
deductions and remittances, the treasurer of the board shall notify the legislative
auditor who shall order the depository to withhold payment of the checks of the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 48 ENROLLED
sheriff's general fund or any available funding source of the employer until the
remittance is made.
* * *
(6)(a) Any person who is a crier of the Louisiana Supreme Court on the
effective date of this Paragraph, who is not a member of this fund, but who is a
member of another Louisiana public retirement system may elect to become a
member of this fund by notifying this fund and the other system in writing by
September 30, 2026.
(b) Any person who is an employee of the Louisiana Supreme Court and
who is not a member of this fund but who is a member of another Louisiana public
retirement system covering Louisiana Supreme Court criers on the effective date of
this Paragraph who later becomes a crier of the Louisiana Supreme Court may elect
to remain a member of the other system by notifying this fund and the other system
in writing within thirty days of the person's employment date as a crier.
* * *
§2178. Disability benefits; retirement benefits; death benefits
* * *
O. No one who receives a benefit from this pension fund shall be eligible to
receive a benefit under the provisions of R.S. 13:75.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.